Utah statutes.
10-2-707.   Disposition of records.

The books, documents, records, papers, and seal of any dissolved municipality shall be deposited with the county clerk for safekeeping and reference.  All court records of justice court judges shall be deposited with a justice court judge of the county to be designated by the court, and other records with the district court.  The courts respectively have authority to execute and complete all unfinished business standing on the same.



Amended by Chapter 59, 1990 General Session

